Louisiana, session 2026, HB1206.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Chapter 18 of Subtitle I of Title 30 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of
1950, to be comprised of R.S. 30:1601 through 1603 and Chapter 24 of Subtitle II of Title
30 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950 to be comprised of R.S. 30:2591 and 2592, are
hereby enacted to read as follows:
CHAPTER 18. DATA CENTERS
§1601. Definitions
As used in this Chapter the following words shall have the following
meanings unless context clearly requires otherwise:
(1) "Data center" means a facility that is designed to have a load of one
hundred megawatts or more and whose primary purpose is the storage, management,
and processing of digital data via the interconnection and operation of information
technology and network telecommunications equipment, including all related
Page 1 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2671 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1206
facilities and infrastructure for backup electricity generation, power distribution,
environmental control, cooling, and security.
(2) "Water usage effectiveness" means a calculation of a data center's total
water input divided by the total water consumption of the data center's information
technology equipment.
§1602. Permitting
A. Any data center whose proposed consumptive use exceeds one hundred
million gallons of water per year requires a permit from the department.
B. The owner or operator of a data center shall provide the department with
the following information, at a minimum, to assist the department in determining the
ability of a water source to meet a project's water use needs at a proposed location:
(1) A project description.
(2) The project's estimated water use rates for the maximum day, maximum
month, and average year.
(3) The anticipated source or sources of water.
(4) The water quality or temperature requirements.
C. The department shall consider the following factors prior to issuing a
permit for a proposed location:
(1) The impact on public health, safety, and welfare.
(2) The use of technologies or measures that promote water conservation, the
efficient use of water, and watershed health including but not limited to:
(a) Use of water efficient fixtures and practices.
(b) Treatment and recycling of water before discharging.
(c) Partnerships with local water utilities to utilize discharged water.
(d) Use of reclaimed water.
(e) Use of closed-loop systems.
(f) Support of water restoration and replenishment in local watersheds.
(3) The impact on aquatic life, vegetation, and other wildlife.
Page 2 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2671 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1206
D. No permit shall be issued by the department without first providing notice
to the governing authority of any parish affected and conducting a public hearing to
receive public comments. Notice may be made by electronic mail to the parish
president, police jury president, or mayor-president, depending on the form of parish
government.
E. The department is authorized to promulgate rules in accordance with the
Administrative Procedure Act to implement the provisions of this Section, including
but not limited to rules establishing the following:
(1) A schedule of fees to be charged to requesting applicants for the
evaluation and certification process and updating a water usage report, including the
costs of inspections.
(2) Procedures for providing the notice and for conducting the required
hearings.
(3) Any other rules or regulations as necessary to comply with this Section.
§1603. Reporting requirements
A. No later than six months after the effective date of this Act or within three
months of starting operations for a new data center, and quarterly thereafter, the
owner or operator of a data center shall prepare and submit a water usage report to
the department that contains at least the following information:
(1) Basic information relating to the data center, including all of the
following:
(a) The name of the data center.
(b) The owner or operator of the data center.
(c) The address of the data center.
(d) The nature and purpose of the data center.
(e) The month and year that the data center commenced operation.
(2) Information related to water usage at the data center, including all of the
following:
Page 3 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2671 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1206
(a) The total water input in gallons including the respective volumes of water
input for specific functions of the data center.
(b) The source or sources of water for the data center including a municipal
water supply, groundwater, or surface water, and whether water from such sources
is potable or reclaimed, and any permits received subject to the Environmental
Quality Act. If the data center utilizes more than one water source, the data center
shall provide information regarding water usage from each source as a percentage
of total water usage.
(c) Performance calculations and indicators for the data center regarding
water use effectiveness.
B. Within thirty days of receiving a water usage report from the owner or
operator of a data center pursuant to this Section, the department shall publish the
information on its website and update the information as necessary.
C. An owner or operator of a data center that has submitted a water usage
report to the department pursuant to this Section shall notify the department of any
substantial change in operations or technologies at the data center that would require
an update to the information provided in the water usage report at least sixty days
prior to implementing the change in operations or technologies at the data center.
D. The department is authorized to promulgate rules in accordance with the
Administrative Procedure Act to implement the provisions of this Section.
E. Any violation of this Section or the rules promulgated thereunder shall
subject the violator to the penalties provided for in R.S. 30:18.
* * *
CHAPTER 24. DATA CENTERS
§2591. Data center permitting; hearings
A. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, no permit
shall be issued by the department for a data center, as defined in R.S. 30:1601(1),
without first providing notice to the governing authority of any parish affected and
conducting a public hearing to receive public comments. Notice may be made by
Page 4 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2671 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1206
electronic mail to the parish president, police jury president, or mayor-president,
depending on the form of parish government.
B. The department is authorized to promulgate rules in accordance with the
Administrative Procedure Act to implement the provisions of this Section, including
but not limited to rules establishing the following:
(1) A schedule of fees to be charged to requesting applicants for the
evaluation and certification process, including the costs of inspections.
(2) Procedures for providing the notice and for conducting the required
hearings.
(3) Any other rules or regulations as necessary to comply with this Section.
§2592. Permit transparency
The department shall assign a unique identifier to each data center. Any
permit associated with the data center, regardless of the named applicant or entity
seeking the permit, shall include the unique identifier.